Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-15,170
Grievance procedures; requirements.

A housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall comply with any federal regulations regarding administrative grievance procedures. Such procedures and the actions to which it applies shall be detailed in plain language and included as part of a resident's lease agreement and also easily accessible on the agency's website and at agency offices.

Laws 2024, LB840, § 12.